Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 4. Employee Security Requirements

§ 21-7-401.
Boards of trustees to require criminal history background information.

The board of trustees of each school district within the state shall require any employee initially hired by the school board on or after July 1, 1996, who may have access to minors to submit to fingerprinting for the purpose of obtaining state or national criminal history record information before employment. The provisions of this section shall not apply to persons certificated under W.S.

21-2-802

who have met the requirements of this section pursuant to the certification process.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 94, § 1.